Georgia, session 2025_26, HB423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
11 PART I
12 SECTION 1-1.
13 Article 12 of Chapter 3 of Title 38 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
14 emergency communications authority, is amended by revising Code Section 38-3-181,
15 relating to definitions, as follows:
H. B. 423
- 1 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
16 "38-3-181.
17 As used in this article, the term:
18 (1) 'Authority' means the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority established
19 pursuant to Code Section 38-3-182.
20 (2) 'Board of directors' or 'board' means the governing body of the authority.
21 (2.1) 'Commonly accepted standards' means the technical standards followed by the
22 communications industry for network, device, and internet protocol connectivity that
23 enables interoperability. Such standards are developed and approved by a standards
24 development organization that is accredited by an American standards body, such as the
25 Association of Public-Safety Communications Officials, the Internet Engineering Task
26 Force, or the National Emergency Number Association.
27 (2.2) 'Emergency medical dispatch' means the management of requests for emergency
28 medical assistance by utilizing a system of:
29 (A) A tiered response or priority dispatching of emergency medical resources based
30 on the level of medical assistance appropriate for the victim; and
31 (B) Prearrival first aid or other medical instructions given by trained
32 telecommunicators responsible for receiving 9-1-1 calls and dispatching public safety
33 agencies.
34 (3) 'Emergency 9-1-1 system' or '9-1-1 system' has the same meaning as provided set
35 forth in Code Section 46-5-122.
36 (4) 'Enhanced ZIP Code' has the same meaning as provided set forth in Code Section
37 46-5-122.
38 (4.1) 'ESInet' means a state emergency services IP network which is an NG9-1-1 network
39 contracted by the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority to one or more
40 NG9-1-1 system providers for the purpose of securely receiving 9-1-1 requests for
41 emergency assistance, transferring 9-1-1 requests for emergency assistance and all
H. B. 423
- 2 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
42 associated data, providing centralized network management and security monitoring, and
43 enabling call routing using GIS data.
44 (4.2) 'Geographic information systems data' or 'GIS data' means digital geospatial
45 information that can be used to assist in locating a person who places a 9-1-1 request for
46 emergency assistance, including, but not limited to, mapped data sets, such as public
47 safety answering point boundaries; boundaries; site structure address points; road
48 centerlines; emergency service boundaries; and other additional data.
49 (5) 'Local government' means a county, municipality, regional authority, or consolidated
50 government in this state that operates or contracts for the operation of a public safety
51 answering point and has adopted a resolution or ordinance pursuant to Code
52 Section 46-5-133 to impose 9-1-1 charges under Code Section 46-5-134.
53 (5.1) 'Next Generation core services' means services required to deliver secure,
54 interoperable, multimedia-capable services to public safety answering points, seamlessly
55 and without the need for proprietary interfaces.
56 (6) 'Next Generation 9-1-1' or 'NG911' 'NG9-1-1' is a secure, nationwide, interoperable,
57 standards-based, all Internet protocol emergency communications infrastructure enabling
58 end-to-end transmission of all types of data, including, but not limited to, voice and
59 multimedia communications from the public to a public safety answering point. means
60 an internet protocol based system that:
61 (A) Ensures interoperability;
62 (B) Is secure;
63 (C) Provides resiliency and redundancy;
64 (D) Employs commonly accepted standards;
65 (E) Enables 9-1-1 public safety answering points to receive, process, and analyze all
66 types of 9-1-1 requests for emergency assistance;
67 (F) Acquires and integrates additional information useful for handling 9-1-1 requests
68 for emergency assistance; and
H. B. 423
- 3 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
69 (G) Supports the sharing of information related to 9-1-1 requests for emergency
70 assistance among public safety answering points and emergency response providers.
71 (6.1) 'Next Generation 9-1-1 system provider' or 'NG9-1-1 system provider' means an
72 entity that provides a Next Generation 9-1-1 system to a public safety answering point.
73 (7) '9-1-1 charge' has the same meaning as provided set forth in Code Section 46-5-122.
74 (7.1) '9-1-1 request for emergency assistance' means a communication, such as voice,
75 text, picture, multimedia, or any other type of data, that is sent to a 9-1-1 public safety
76 answering point for the purpose of requesting emergency assistance.
77 (8) 'Primary public safety answering point' means the first point of reception of a 9-1-1
78 request for emergency assistance by a facility that has been designated to receive 9-1-1
79 requests for emergency assistance and route such requests to emergency service
80 personnel as defined in 47 U.S.C.A. Section 222.
81 (8)(8.1) 'Public safety answering point' has the same meaning as provided set forth in
82 Code Section 46-5-122.
83 (9) 'Service supplier' has the same meaning as provided set forth in Code Section
84 46-5-122.
85 (10) 'Telephone subscriber' has the same meaning as provided set forth in Code Section
86 46-5-122.
87 (11) 'Wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge' has the same meaning as provided set forth in
88 Code Section 46-5-122."
89 SECTION 1-2.
90 Said article is further amended by revising subsection (c) and paragraph (1) of subsection (d)
91 of Code Section 38-3-182, relating to establishment of the Georgia Emergency
92 Communications Authority, purpose, duties and responsibilities, board of directors, perpetual
93 existence, power and authority, operation, and regulation, as follows:
H. B. 423
- 4 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
94 "(c) In addition to the purposes specified in subsection (b) of this Code section, the
95 authority shall have the duties and responsibilities to:
96 (1) Apply for, receive, and use federal grants or state grants or both;
97 (2) Study, evaluate, and recommend, and enforce technology standards commonly
98 accepted standards for a state-wide NG9-1-1 system the regional and state-wide provision
99 of a public safety communications network and 9-1-1 system;
100 (3) Identify any changes necessary to accomplish more effective and efficient 9-1-1
101 service across this state, including consolidation and interoperability of 9-1-1 systems;
102 (4) Identify any changes necessary in the assessment and collection of fees under Part 4
103 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46;
104 (5) Develop, offer, or make recommendations to the Georgia Public Safety Training
105 Center, Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, and other state agencies
106 as to training that should be provided to telecommunicators, trainers, supervisors, and
107 directors of public safety answering points;
108 (6) Recommend minimum standards for operation of public safety answering points;
109 (7) Collect data and statistics regarding the performance of public safety answering
110 points;
111 (8) Identify any necessary changes or enhancements to develop and deploy NG911
112 NG9-1-1 statewide state wide; and
113 (9) Upon request by a public safety answering point, provide assistance to such public
114 safety answering point with its locally managed processes to be regarded as Logan's List:
115 the collection, storage, retrieval, and dissemination of information voluntarily submitted
116 to a public safety answering point which indicates an individual has a physical, mental,
117 or neurological condition which impedes his or her ability to communicate with any law
118 enforcement officer or emergency responder.;
H. B. 423
- 5 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
119 (10) Administer the deployment of a 9-1-1 service for emerging communications
120 technologies, including, but not limited to, the state ESInet and Next Generation core
121 services;
122 (11) Establish and operate a network management center in coordination with
123 cybersecurity subject matter experts to protect the state ESInet, Next Generation core
124 services, and public safety answering points;
125 (12) Monitor the state ESInet performance and service provider adherence to commonly
126 accepted standards;
127 (13) Establish cooperative purchasing agreements or other contracts for the procurement
128 of goods and services, including, but not limited to, call-handling equipment, computer
129 aided dispatch, data management, and logging recorders;
130 (14) Coordinate, adopt, and communicate all necessary technical standards and
131 requirements to ensure an effective state-wide interconnected and interoperable state
132 ESInet;
133 (15) Coordinate, adopt, and communicate all necessary technical standards and
134 requirements for GIS data related to NG9-1-1;
135 (16) Collect, manage, and analyze 9-1-1 requests for emergency assistance data delivered
136 to the state ESInet for the purpose of monitoring state ESInet and Next Generation core
137 services performance;
138 (17) Coordinate outreach and education programs on how the public and emergency
139 response providers can best use NG9-1-1 and the capabilities and usefulness of NG9-1-1;
140 (18) Coordinate with rural and urban 9-1-1 public safety answering points, regional
141 authorities, local authorities, and other relevant stakeholders to develop a plan for the
142 implementation of NG9-1-1;
143 (19) Coordinate with rural and urban 9-1-1 public safety answering points, regional
144 authorities, local authorities, and other relevant stakeholders to prepare and submit
145 applications for eligible grant funding related to NG9-1-1;
H. B. 423
- 6 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
146 (20) Promote interoperability between 9-1-1 public safety answering points that are
147 deploying or have deployed Next Generation 9-1-1 and emergency response providers,
148 including users of the nation-wide public safety broadband network;
149 (21) Coordinate with adjoining states, Native American tribes, and federal entities to
150 establish and maintain NG9-1-1; and
151 (22) Develop recommendations for the most efficient and effective short-term and
152 long-term implementation and maintenance of NG9-1-1.
153 (d)(1) Control and management of the authority shall be vested in a board of directors
154 which shall consist of the following:
155 (A) The commissioner of public safety or his or her designee;
156 (B) The commissioner of revenue or his or her designee;
157 (C) The director of the Georgia Public Safety Training Center or his or her designee;
158 (D) Three members appointed by the Governor who shall be 9-1-1 directors, each of
159 whom shall be currently employed by a public safety answering point. The
160 Georgia 9-1-1 Directors Association, the Georgia Chapter of the Association of Public
161 Safety Communications Officials, and the Georgia Chapter of the National Emergency
162 Number Association may provide recommendations to the Governor for such
163 appointments;
164 (E) One member appointed by the Governor who shall be an elected member of a
165 county governing authority that operates or contracts for the operation of a public safety
166 answering point. The Association County Commissioners of Georgia may provide
167 recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;
168 (F) One member appointed by the Governor who shall be a county manager, county
169 administrator, or finance officer from a county that operates or contracts for the
170 operation of a public safety answering point. The Association County Commissioners
171 of Georgia may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;
H. B. 423
- 7 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
172 (G) One member appointed by the Governor who shall be an elected member of a city
173 governing authority that operates or contracts for the operation of a public safety
174 answering point. The Georgia Municipal Association may provide recommendations
175 to the Governor for such appointment;
176 (H) One member appointed by the Governor who shall be a city manager, city
177 administrator, or finance officer from a city that operates or contracts for the operation
178 of a public safety answering point. The Georgia Municipal Association may provide
179 recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;
180 (I) Two members from the telecommunications industry who shall be appointed by the
181 Governor;
182 (J) One member appointed by the Governor who is a sheriff responsible for managing
183 a public safety answering point. The Georgia Sheriffs' Association may provide
184 recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;
185 (K) One police chief appointed by the Governor who is serving a local government.
186 The Georgia Association of Chiefs of Police may provide recommendations to the
187 Governor for such appointment; and
188 (L) One fire chief appointed by the Governor who is serving a local government. The
189 Georgia Association of Fire Chiefs may provide recommendations to the Governor for
190 such appointment.;
191 (M) The executive director of the Georgia Technology Authority or his or her
192 designee;
193 (N) One member who is a subject matter expert in cybersecurity who shall be
194 appointed by the Governor; and
195 (O) One member who is a subject matter expert in geographic information systems
196 data who shall be appointed by the Governor."
H. B. 423
- 8 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
197 SECTION 1-3.
198 Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 38-3-183, relating to appointment
199 of executive director, role, and additional staffing, as follows:
200 "38-3-183.
201 The director of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall
202 appoint an executive director, subject to approval by the board, who shall be the
203 administrative head of the authority, and shall establish the salary of the executive director.
204 The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of such director. The executive director
205 shall be considered the state 9-1-1 administrator for the purposes of relevant state and
206 federal law and program requirements. The executive director, with the concurrence and
207 approval of such director, shall hire officers, agents, and employees; prescribe their duties,
208 responsibilities, and qualifications; set their salaries; and perform such other duties as may
209 be prescribed by the authority. Such officers, agents, and employees shall serve at the
210 pleasure of the executive director."
211 PART II
212 SECTION 2-1.
213 Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
214 relating to emergency telephone number 9-1-1 system, is amended by adding a new
215 paragraph to Code Section 46-5-122, relating to definitions, to read as follows:
216 "(10.1) 'Next Generation 9-1-1' or 'NG9-1-1' shall have the same meaning as set forth in
217 Code Section 38-3-181."
H. B. 423
- 9 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
218 SECTION 2-2.
219 Said part is further amended by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section
220 46-5-124, relating to guidelines for implementing state-wide emergency 9-1-1 system and
221 training and equipment standards, as follows:
222 "(1) Steps of action necessary for public agencies to effect the necessary coordination,
223 regulation, and development preliminary to a 9-1-1 system that shall incorporate the
224 requirements of each public service safety agency in each local government of Georgia;"
225 SECTION 2-3.
226 Said part is further amended by revising Code Section 46-5-126, relating to cooperation by
227 commission and telephone industry, as follows:
228 "46-5-126.
229 The authority shall coordinate its activities with those of the Public Service Commission,
230 commission which shall encourage the Georgia telephone industry to activate facility
231 modification plans for a timely 9-1-1 support the timely implementation of NG9-1-1."
232 SECTION 2-4.
233 Said part is further amended by revising Code Section 46-5-127, relating to approval of 9-1-1
234 systems by agency and written confirmation by authority required for 9-1-1 systems
235 established on or after January 1, 2019, as follows:
236 "46-5-127.
237 (a) After January 1, 1978, and prior to January 1, 2019, no emergency 9-1-1 system shall
238 be established, and no existing system shall be expanded to provide wireless
239 enhanced 9-1-1 service, without written confirmation by the Georgia Emergency
240 Management and Homeland Security Agency that the local plan conforms to the guidelines
241 and procedures provided for in Code Section 46-5-124.
H. B. 423
- 10 -

25 LC 56 0308/AP
242 (b) On or after January 1, 2019, and prior to July 1, 2025, no emergency 9-1-1 system shall
243 be established, and no existing system shall be expanded to provide wireless
244 enhanced 9-1-1 service, without written confirmation by the authority that the local plan
245 conforms to the guidelines and procedures provided for in Code Section 46-5-124. The
246 authority shall not deny the establishment of a new system or an expansion to provide
247 wireless enhanced 9-1-1 service if the local plan conforms to the guidelines and procedures
248 provided for in Code Section 46-5-124.
249 (c) On or after July 1, 2025, no emergency 9-1-1 system shall be established, and no
250 existing system shall be expanded to provide wireless enhanced 9-1-1 service or NG9-1-1
251 service, without written confirmation by the authority that the local plan conforms to the
252 guidelines and procedures provided for in Code Section 46-5-124. The authority shall not
253 deny establishment of a new system or an expansion to provide wireless enhanced 9-1-1
254 service or NG9-1-1 service if the local plan conforms to the guidelines and procedures
255 provided for in Code Section 46-5-124."
256 PART III
257 SECTION 3-1.
258 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 423
- 11 -